Massachusetts, session 194th, H851.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby amended by 
inserting after chapter 57 the following new chapter:- 
Chapter 57A – Census Equity and Accuracy 
Section 1. For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the following 
meanings: 
“Census day”, the day by which residents in the United States must be counted, as set 
forth in title 13 of the United States Code. 
“Commission”, the Massachusetts census equity commission. 
“Persons experiencing homelessness”, individuals who lack, or are perceived to lack, a 
fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. Persons experiencing homelessness includes, 

of 7 11 but is not limited to, persons who: (1) share the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, 
economic hardship or a similar reason; (2) live in motels, hotels, trailer parks or campgrounds 
due to the lack of fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; (3) live in emergency or 
transitional shelters; (4) are abandoned in hospitals; (5) are awaiting foster care placement; (6) 
have a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily 
used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; (7) live in cars, parks, public 
spaces, abandoned buildings, bus or train stations or similar settings; or (8) are transient and 
otherwise experiencing homelessness as described in this subsection. 
“Undercounted communities”, groups of residents of the commonwealth who are 
traditionally undercounted in census implementations, including but not limited to: (1) 
communities of color; (2) immigrants, regardless of documentation; (3) individuals of all gender 
identities, gender presentations, and sexual orientations; (4) individuals with incomes under 
200% of the federal poverty line; (5) persons experiencing homeless; (6) individuals with 
disabilities; (7) individuals who are veterans; (8) individuals under the age of 16 years; (9) 
individuals for whom English is not their first language; (10) residents of rural communities; and 
(11) residents of subsidized housing. 
Section 2. (a) There is hereby established, within the office of the state secretary, the 
Massachusetts census equity commission. The purpose of the commission shall be to ensure that 
Massachusetts censuses accurately and completely count all residents of the commonwealth, 
including but not limited to undercounted communities. 
(b) The commission shall consist of 29 members, as follows: the secretary of state, or 
designee, who shall serve as chair; the attorney general, or designee; the Senate chair of the 

of 7 33 committee on election laws; the House chair of the committee on redistricting; the Senate 
minority leader, or designee; the House minority leader, or designee; a Senate member of the 
Black and Latino Legislative Caucus; a House member of the Asian Legislative Caucus; the 
commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education, or designee; the 
commissioner of the office of refugees and immigrants, or designee; a member of the Boston city 
council, selected by majority vote of the council; a member of the Worcester city council, 
selected by majority vote of the council; a member of the Springfield city council, selected by 
majority vote of the council; a member of the Lowell city council, selected by majority vote of 
the council; a member of the New Bedford city council, selected by majority vote of the council; 
a member of the Barnstable town council, selected by majority vote of the council; a member of 
the Greenfield town council, selected by majority vote of the council; the executive director of 
the Massachusetts Immigrant and Refugee Advocacy Coalition; a representative of the Grove 
Hall Safe Neighborhood Initiative; the executive director of the Massachusetts Coalition for the 
Homeless; 4 members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who shall be 
residents of the Commonwealth, 2 of whom shall represent faith communities of color in the 
commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent minority and women-owned businesses in the 
commonwealth, and 1 of whom shall be a member of the Wampanoag tribe; and 5 members 
appointed by the president of the senate who shall be residents of the Commonwealth, 1 of 
whom shall represent youth residents of the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent older 
adult residents of the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall be a veteran, 1 of whom shall represent 
individuals with disabilities, and 1 of whom shall represent tenants and renters. Appointments 
shall promote diverse geographic, cultural, ethnic, racial, and gender representation on the 
commission. 

of 7 56  Section 3. (a) The commission shall develop and implement census outreach programs to:  
increase awareness of the census, focusing efforts in undercounted communities; educate 
residents of the commonwealth about the importance of an accurate census count; alleviate 
concerns about perceived repercussions for participating in the census count; and engage 
undercounted communities in the census counting process.  
(b) The census outreach programs shall take into account barriers to proper counting of 
all residents of the commonwealth. 
(c) The census outreach programs shall include communications to residents of the 
commonwealth through school-based programs, partnerships with non-profit and community-
based programs, and a multi-lingual, multi-media, multi-platform campaign. 
(d) For purposes of implementing the census outreach programs, the commission shall 
solicit participation from relevant experts and practitioners as necessary to achieve the goals set 
forth in subsection (a) of this section; and may create and appoint working groups as it deems 
appropriate. 
Section 4. The commission shall be coordinated through the office of the secretary of 
state which shall provide administrative support to the commission and coordinate with state 
agencies and constitutional officers, as well as units of local government, to identify effective 
methods of outreach and to provide resources to ensure that outreach programs are successful 
and all residents are counted.    
Section 5. (a) Members of the commission shall serve four-year terms, provided that no 
term shall terminate within the 24-month period prior to a census day or the 6-month period 
subsequent to a census day. 

of 7 78  (b) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but may 
be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the course of their service on the commission.  
(c) The commission may employ a director and assistant director upon a simple majority 
vote of the full membership of the commission. The director and assistant director may be 
compensated from moneys appropriated or available for that purpose. 
Section 6. Vacancies on the commission shall be filled in like manner as the original 
appointment. 
Section 7. (a) During the 24-month period prior to a census day, the commission shall 
meet at least monthly, or more frequently at the call of the chair or by majority vote of the 
members. 
(b) At all times other than the period set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the 
commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chair or by majority 
vote of the members. 
(c) To the extent practicable, the commission shall rotate meeting locations throughout 
every region of the commonwealth. 
Section 8. The secretary of the commonwealth shall use all reasonable efforts to secure 
federal funding for implementation of the census outreach programs. At least forty percent of the 
funds spent implementing the census outreach programs must be spent on undercounted 
communities.  
Section 9. (a) Not later than June 1 in the odd-numbered year immediately preceding a 
census day, the commission shall file with the governor, the secretary of the commonwealth, the 

of 7 99 attorney general, and the general court joint committees on election laws and redistricting, an 
100 interim report containing: (1) its proposed census outreach programs to encourage full 
101 participation and avoid an undercount in the upcoming decennial census; and (2) any 
102 recommendations for regulatory or legislative action necessary to ensure an accurate count of all 
103 Massachusetts residents in the upcoming decennial census. 
104  (b) The general court joint committees on election laws and redistricting may, separately 
105 or collectively, issue to the commission suggestions for improvements to the proposed census 
106 outreach programs contained in the interim report. The committees may, separately or 
107 collectively, hold public hearings in advance of preparing and issuing said suggestions. Any 
108 suggestions must be issued to the commission by November 1 in the odd-numbered year 
109 immediately preceding a census day. 
110  (c) Not later than December 10 in the odd-numbered year immediately preceding a 
111 census day, the committee shall file with the governor, the secretary of the commonwealth, the 
112 attorney general, and the general court joint committees on election laws and redistricting, a final 
113 report containing the census outreach programs to be implemented throughout the 
114 commonwealth. 
115  (d) Not later than February 1 in the odd-numbered year immediately subsequent to a 
116 census day, the committee shall file with the governor, the secretary of the commonwealth, the 
117 attorney general, and the legislative committees on election laws and redistricting, a post-
118 implementation report containing: (1) a detailed accounting of the census outreach programs 
119 implemented for the immediately prior decennial census; (2) an assessment of the perceived 
120 levels of success of the components of the census outreach programs; (3) recommendations for 

of 7 121 improvements in the next census outreach programs, including in the commission’s discretion 
122 appropriate recommended legislative or regulatory action; and (4) other notable outcomes of the 
123 commission’s work.  
124  (e) The commission may update its post-implementation report as appropriate, in its 
125 discretion, until December 31 in the second odd-numbered year subsequent to a census day.